Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1517
Rules and regulations.

The department or the state, in consultation with Indian tribes, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish standards and procedures for the department's or the state's review of cases subject to the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act and methods for monitoring the department's or the state's compliance with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act. The standards and procedures and the monitoring methods shall be integrated into the department's or the state's structure and plan for the federal government's child and family service review process and any program improvement plan resulting from that process.

Laws 2015, LB566, § 15.